Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.196

Intercollegiate coaches—Training to promote coaching competence and techniques.

The community and technical colleges are encouraged to provide training to promote development of coaching competence and to enhance the coaching techniques of intercollegiate coaches. The community and technical colleges may offer this educational service to coaches in the community and technical colleges, common schools, amateur teams, youth groups, and community sports groups. The community and technical colleges may provide this educational service through curriculum courses, workshops, or in-service training.

[ 1993 c 94 s 3.]

NOTES:

Policy—1993 c 94: See note following RCW 28B.50.195.